Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 2 State Militia [Renumbered]

Cross references. —

For provisions establishing state guard when national guard ordered into service of the United States, see §

19-10-101

et seq.

For provisions concerning state militia, see art. 17, §§ 1 to 5, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

The provisions of this chapter were derived principally from ch. 163, Laws 1925, which is the basic act relating to the national guard.

Sections 51 and 57, ch. 163, Laws 1925 (§§ 30-161 and 30-155, W.C.S. 1945, respectively), were repealed by § 1, ch. 159, Laws 1955.